es: Tipo de montaje de las manecillas del reloj: Euroshaft; Euroshaft de rotación alta; Eje I de rotación alta; Eje I; Ajuste a presión; Otros
de: Montageart für Uhrzeiger: Euroshaft; Euroshaft mit hohem Drehmoment; I-Welle mit hohem Drehmoment; I-Welle; Einpressmontage; Sonstiges
ko: 시계 바늘 장착 유형: 유로샤프트; 하이 토크 유로샤프트; 하이 토크 I-샤프트; I-샤프트; 압입식; 기타
nb: Monteringstype for klokkeviser: Euroshaft; Euroshaft med høyt dreiemoment; I-aksel med høyt dreiemoment; I-sjakt; Presspassning; Annet
da: Urvisers monteringstype: Euroshaft; Euroshaft med højt drejningsmoment; I-shaft med højt drejningsmoment; I-shaft; Pressfit; Andet
it: Tipo di montaggio delle lancette dell'orologio: Euroshaft; Euroshaft ad alta coppia; Albero motore a l ad alta coppia; Albero motore a I; A pressione; Altro
vi: Kiểu gắn kim đồng hồ: Trục kiểu Châu Âu; Trục kiểu Châu Âu lực mô-men xoắn cao; Trục chữ I lực mô-men xoắn cao; Trục chữ I; Ép khít; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve urnega kazalca: Eurogred; Eurogred z visokim navorom; I-gred z visokim navorom; I-gred; Tlačno prileganje; Druga
pl: Typ mocowania wskazówki zegara: Mocowanie Euroshaft; Euroshaft o wysokim momencie; I-shaft o wysokim momencie; Mocowanie I-shaft; Mocowanie wciskane; Pozostałe
nl: Type wijzermontage: Euro-as; Euro-as met hoog koppel; I-as met hoog koppel; I-as; Perspassing; Overig
zh-CN: 钟表指针安装类型: 欧式轴; 高扭矩欧式轴; 高扭矩 I 轴; I 形轴; 压入式; 其他
lt-LT: Laikrodžio rodyklės tvirtinimo tipas: „Euroshaft“; Didelio sukimo momento „Euroshaft“; Didelio sukimo momento I formos velenas; I-velenas; Presuojamas; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem do ponteiro do relógio: Euroshaft; Euroshaft de alto torque; Eixo I de alto torque; Eixo em I; Encamixe por pressão; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de montare a limbii de ceas: Ax european; Ax european cu cuplu ridicat; Ax I cu cuplu ridicat; Ax I; Montare prin presare; Altele
ja: 時計針の取り付けタイプ: ユーロシャフト; 高トルクユーロシャフト; 高トルクIシャフト; I型シャフト; プレスフィット; その他
en: Clock hand mounting type: Euroshaft; High-torque Euroshaft; High-torque I-shaft; I-shaft; Press-fit; Other
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης δεικτών ρολογιού: Euroshaft; Euroshaft υψηλής ροπής; Άξονας I υψηλής ροπής; Άξονας Ι; Με πίεση; Άλλο
sv: Monteringstyp för klockans visare: Euroshaft; High-torque Euroshaft; High-torque I-shaft; I-shaft; Presspassning; Övrigt
zh-TW: 鐘針安裝類型: Euroshaft; 高扭力 Euroshaft; 高扭力 I 軸; I 軸; 壓接式; 其他
fi: Kellon viisarien kiinnitystyyppi: Euroshaft; Suurivääntöinen Euroshaft; Suurivääntöinen I-akseli; I-akseli; Puristuskiinnitteinen; Muu
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia ručičiek hodín: mechanizmus Euroshaft; Euroshaft s vysokým krútiacim momentom; I-shaft s vysokým krútiacim momentom; mechanizmus I-shaft; Stlačením; Iné
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на часовниковата стрелка: Euroshaft; Euroshaft с висок въртящ момент; I-образен вал с висок въртящ момент; I-образен вал; Пресово пасване; Друго
ru: Тип крепления стрелок часов: Посадка Euroshaft; Euroshaft с высоким моментом; Двутавровый вал с высоким моментом; Двутавровый вал; Прессовая посадка; Другой
hu: Óramutató rögzítési típusa: Euroshaft; Nagy nyomatékú Euroshaft; Nagy nyomatékú I-tengely; I-tengely; Sajtolt illesztés; Egyéb
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งเข็มนาฬิกา: ยูโรชาฟท์; ยูโรชาฟท์แรงบิดสูง; ไอชาฟท์แรงบิดสูง; ไอชาฟท์; แบบกดให้แน่น; อื่นๆ
tr: Saat ibresi montaj tipi: Euroşaft; Yüksek torklu Euroshaft; Yüksek torklu I-shaft; I-şaft; Sıkı geçme; Diğer
hr-HR: Način postavljanja kazaljke sata: Euroshaft; Euroshaft visokog okretnog momenta; I-osovina visokog okretnog momenta; I-osovina; Prešano uklapanje; Ostalo
cs: Typ upevnění hodinových ručiček: Euroshaft; Euroshaft s vysokým točivým momentem; I-shaft s vysokým točivým momentem; I-shaft; Lisovaný spoj; Jiné
fr: Type de fixation des aiguilles de l’horloge: Axe euro; Axe euro à couple élevé; Axe en I à couple élevé; Axe en I; Montage par pression; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem do ponteiro do relógio: Eixo europeu; Eixo europeu de alto binário; Eixo em I de alto binário; Eixo em I; Encaixe por pressão; Outro